incubator/apertium-mk-sq.sq.dix
    <pardef n="mi/k__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kut</l>
          <r>k<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ku</l>
          <r>k<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ku</l>
          <r>k<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>k</l>
          <r>k<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kut</l>
          <r>k<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ku</l>
          <r>k<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kun</l>
          <r>k<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>k</l>
          <r>k<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>qve</l>
          <r>k<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>qve</l>
          <r>k<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>qsh</l>
          <r>k<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>qtë</l>
          <r>k<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>q</l>
          <r>k<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>qve</l>
          <r>k<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>qve</l>
          <r>k<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>qtë</l>
          <r>k<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>q</l>
          <r>k<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="afër__pr">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="pr"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  </pardefs>

    <e lm="afër"><i>afër</i><par n="afër__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="me"><i>me</i><par n="afër__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="pa"><i>pa</i><par n="afër__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="plej"><i>plej</i><par n="afër__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="para"><i>para</i><par n="afër__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="pas"><i>pas</i><par n="afër__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="prapa"><i>prapa</i><par n="afër__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="sipas"><i>sipas</i><par n="afër__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="drejt"><i>drejt</i><par n="afër__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="kundër"><i>kundër</i><par n="afër__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="matanë"><i>matanë</i><par n="afër__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="mbas"><i>mbas</i><par n="afër__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="mes"><i>mes</i><par n="afër__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="midis"><i>midis</i><par n="afër__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="ndaj"><i>ndaj</i><par n="afër__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="ndërmjet"><i>ndërmjet</i><par n="afër__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="nga"><i>nga</i><par n="afër__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="pasi"><i>pasi</i><par n="afër__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="perpara"><i>perpara</i><par n="afër__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="për"><i>për</i><par n="afër__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="i"><i>i</i><par n="afër__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="mik"><i>mi</i><par n="mi/k__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="armik"><i>armi</i><par n="mi/k__n_m"/></e>
